North Carolina, session 2025, HB336.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The following described property, identified by Haywood County Tax
Property Identification Number, is removed from the corporate limits of the Town of Maggie
Valley:
7676-87-7296, 7676-87-9555, 7686-06-2866, 7696-07-1339, 7696-16-6643, 7696-16-6705,
8606-19-9568, 8606-19-9725, and 8606-29-3386.
SECTION 2. This act has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the Town of
Maggie Valley for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date
of this act. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this act as
though the property were still within the corporate limits of the Town of Maggie Valley.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the territory
described in Section 1 of this act as of January 1, 2025, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
*H336-v-2*